Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-23] No rules combat, extreme
fighting, or similar contest; prohibited. No person shall promote,
conduct, hold, give, or participate in any no rules combat, extreme fighting,
or similar contests. The director shall enforce the prohibition on no rules
combat, extreme fighting, or similar contests, and may adopt rules, pursuant to
chapter 91, to enforce the prohibition. In addition to any applicable judicial
remedy, a person who violates this section shall be subject to the penalties,
fines, and other disciplinary provisions of this chapter. [L 2007, c 279, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next